Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Article 8. Virginia Respite Care Grant Program.

§§ 51.5-155 through 51.5-158.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 728, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program, see §

51.5-182

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

51.5-155

, pertaining to definitions, derived from 2000, cc. 877, 896, § 2.1-373.15; 2001, c. 844, § 2.2-714; 2010, cc. 411, 801; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Former § 51.5-156, which established the Respite Care Grant Program, derived from 2000, cc. 877, 896, § 2.1-373.16; 2001, c. 844, § 2.2-715; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Former § 51.5-157, which established the Virginia Respite Care Grant Fund, derived from 2000, cc. 877, 896, § 2.1-373.17; 2001, c. 844, § 2.2-716; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Former § 51.5-158, pertaining to grant application process and administration, derived from 2000, cc. 877, 896, § 2.1-373.18; 2001, c. 844, § 2.2-717; 2012, cc. 803, 835.